apertium-mt-ar.ar.dix
    <pardef n="ثان__num"> <!-- 2nd -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ية</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يات</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ثالث__num"> <!-- 3rd-10th -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ة</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="حادي/_عشر__num"> <!-- 11th-19th -->
      <e><p><l><b/>عشر</l><r><b/>عشر<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>عشر</l><r><b/>عشر<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ة<b/>عشرة</l><r>ة<b/>عشرة<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ة<b/>عشرة</l><r>ة<b/>عشرة<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ثلاث/ون__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مئة__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->  

    <pardef n="S__مدرس">
        <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ك</l><r><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ك</l><r><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ها</l><r><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>كما</l><r><s n="px2du"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>هما</l><r><s n="px3du"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نا</l><r><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>كم</l><r><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>هم</l><r><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>هن</l><r><s n="px3pl_f"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="حد/يقة__n_f_nn"> 
        <e><p><l>يقة</l><r>يقة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>يقة</l><r>يقة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ائق</l><r>يقة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ولد/__n_m_aa"> 
        <e><p><l>ولد</l><r>ولد<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>طفلان</l><r>ولد<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>طفلين</l><r>ولد<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>طفلين</l><r>ولد<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>أولاد</l><r>أولاد<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بن/ت__n_f_aa"> 
        <e><p><l>ت</l><r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ات</l><r>ات<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="طقس__n_m_nn">  
        <e><p><l>طقس</l><r>طقس<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="كل/ب__n_m_nn"> 
        <e><p><l>ب</l><r>ب<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>با</l><r>ب<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>اب</l><r>ب<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="قط__n_m_nn">  
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ط</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="لعب/ة__n_f_nn">
        <e><p><l>ة</l><r>ة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>ة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بي/ت__n_m_nn"> 
        <e><p><l>ت</l><r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>وت</l><r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="شجر/ة__n_f_nn">
        <e><p><l>ة</l><r>ة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ات</l><r>ة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="حيوان__n_m_nn">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="أم__n_f_aa">  
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__مدرس"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="S__مدرس"/></e>
        <e><p><l>هات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="أخ/ت__n_f_aa">  
        <e><p><l>ت</l><r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ت</l><r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__مدرس"/></e>
        <e><p><l>وات</l><r>ت<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="سن/ة__n_f_nn">  
        <e><p><l>ة</l><r>ة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>وات</l><r>ة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ن/افذة__n_f_nn">  
        <e><p><l>افذة</l><r>افذة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>وافذ</l><r>افذة<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="يد__n_f_nn">  
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__مدرس"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__مدرس"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p><par n="S__مدرس"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/جواب__n_m_nn">  
        <e><p><l>جواب</l><r>جواب<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>أجوبة</l><r>جواب<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/سؤال__n_m_nn">  
        <e><p><l>سؤال</l><r>سؤال<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>سؤالها</l><r>سؤال<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>أسئلة</l><r>سؤال<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="كر/سي__n_m_nn"> 
        <e><p><l>سي</l><r>سي<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>اسي</l><r>سي<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ثان" c="second"><i>ثان</i><par n="ثان__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثالث" c="third"><i>ثالث</i><par n="ثالث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="رابع" c="fourth"><i>رابع</i><par n="ثالث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="خامس" c="fifth"><i>خامس</i><par n="ثالث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سادس" c="sixth"><i>سادس</i><par n="ثالث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سابع" c="seventh"><i>سابع</i><par n="ثالث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثامن" c="eighth"><i>ثامن</i><par n="ثالث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="تاسع" c="ninth"><i>تاسع</i><par n="ثالث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="عاشر" c="tenth"><i>عاشر</i><par n="ثالث__num"/></e>
    <e lm="حادي عشر" c="eleventh"><i>هادي</i><par n="حادي/_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثاني عشر" c="twelfth"><i>ثاني</i><par n="حادي/_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثالث عشر" c="thirteenth"><i>ثالث</i><par n="حادي/_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="رابع عشر" c="fourteenth"><i>رابع</i><par n="حادي/_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="خامس عشر" c="fifteenth"><i>خامس</i><par n="حادي/_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سادس عشر" c="sixteenth"><i>سادس</i><par n="حادي/_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سابع عشر" c="seventeenth"><i>سابع</i><par n="حادي/_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثامن عشر" c="eighteenth"><i>ثامن</i><par n="حادي/_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="تاسع عشر" c="nineteenth"><i>تاسع</i><par n="حادي/_عشر__num"/></e>
    <e lm="عشرون" c="twentieth"><i>عشر</i><par n="ثلاث/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثلاثون" c="thirtieth"><i>ثلاث</i><par n="ثلاث/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="أربعون" c="fortieth"><i>أربع</i><par n="ثلاث/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="خمسون" c="fiftieth"><i>خنس</i><par n="ثلاث/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ستون" c="sixtieth"><i>ست</i><par n="ثلاث/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سبعون" c="seventieth"><i>سبع</i><par n="ثلاث/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ثمانون" c="eightieth"><i>ثمان</i><par n="ثلاث/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="تسعون" c="ninetieth"><i>تسع</i><par n="ثلاث/ون__num"/></e>
    <e lm="مئة" c="hundredth"><i>مئة</i><par n="مئة__num"/></e>
    <e lm="حديقة" c="garden" ><par n="ה"/><i>حد</i><par n="حد/يقة__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ولد" c="boy" ><par n="ה"/><i></i><par n="ولد/__n_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="بنت" c="girl" ><par n="ה"/><i>بن</i><par n="بن/ت__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="كلب" c="dog" ><par n="ה"/><i>كل</i><par n="كل/ب__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="قط" c="cat" ><par n="ה"/><i>قط</i><par n="قط__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="لعبة" c="play" ><par n="ה"/><i>لعب</i><par n="لعب/ة__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="شجرة" c="tree" ><par n="ה"/><i>شجر</i><par n="شجر/ة__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="حيوان" c="animal"><par n="ה"/><i>حيوان</i><par n="حيوان__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="جواب" c="response"><par n="ה"/><i></i><par n="/جواب__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="أم" c="mother"><i>أم</i><par n="أم__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="أخت" c="sister"><i>أخ</i><par n="أخ/ت__n_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="نافذة" c="window"><par n="ה"/><i>ن</i><par n="ن/افذة__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="يد" c="hand"><i>يد</i><par n="يد__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="عين" c="eye"><i>عين</i><par n="يد__n_f_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="سؤال" c="question"><par n="ה"/><i></i><par n="/سؤال__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="طاولة" c="table" ><par n="ה"/><i>طاول</i><par n="شجر/ة__n_f_nn"/></e>
